Utah statutes.
13-40-401.   Information gathering -- Evaluations.
The division shall:
(1)  establish procedures by which a person may report a violation of this
chapter to the division, including:
(a)  an Internet website; and
(b)  a toll-free telephone number; and
(2)  make recommendations to the Public Utilities and Technology Interim
Committee if the division finds a need for additional provisions to this
chapter.
